Indiana, session 2026, HB1289.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-5-1.3-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 270, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) A study committee shall
study the issues assigned by the legislative council that are within the
subject matter for the study committee, as described in section 4 of this
chapter.
(b) In addition to the issues assigned under subsection (a), the
interim study committee on roads and transportation shall advise the
bureau of motor vehicles regarding the suitability of a special group (as
defined in IC 9-13-2-170) to receive a special group recognition license
plate for the special group (as defined in IC 9-13-2-170) for the first
time under IC 9-18.5-12-4 and the suitability of a special group (as
defined in IC 9-13-2-170) to continue participating in the special group
recognition license plate program under IC 9-18.5-12-5.
(c) In addition to the issues assigned under subsection (a), the
interim study committee on corrections and criminal code shall review
current trends with respect to criminal behavior, sentencing,
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


incarceration, and treatment and may:
(1) identify particular needs of the criminal justice system that can
be addressed by legislation; and
(2) prepare legislation to address the particular needs found by the
committee.
(d) In each even-numbered year, in addition to the issues assigned
under subsection (a), the interim study committee on courts and the
judiciary shall review, consider, and make recommendations
concerning all requests for new courts, new judicial officers, and
changes in jurisdiction of existing courts. A request under this
subsection must include at least the following information to receive
full consideration by the committee:
(1) The level of community support for the change, including
support from the local fiscal body.
(2) The results of a survey that shall be conducted by the county
requesting the change, sampling members of the bar, members of
the judiciary, and local officials to determine needs and concerns
of existing courts.
(3) Whether the county is already using a judge or magistrate
from an overserved area of the judicial district.
(4) The relative severity of need based on the most recent
weighted caseload measurement system report published by the
office of judicial administration.
(5) Whether the county is using any problem solving court as
described in IC 33-23-16-11, and, if so, the list of problem solving
courts established in the county, and any evaluation of the impact
of the problem solving courts on the overall judicial caseload.
(6) A description of the:
(A) county's population growth in the ten (10) years before the
date of the request; and
(B) projected population growth in the county for the ten (10)
years after the date of the request, to the extent available;
and any documentation to support the information provided under
this subdivision.
(7) A description of the county's use of pre-incarceration
diversion services and post-incarceration reentry services in an
effort to decrease recidivism.
(8) If the request is a request for a new court or new courts, an
acknowledgment from the county fiscal body (as defined in
IC 36-1-2-6) with the funding sources and estimated costs the
county intends to pay toward the county's part of the operating
costs associated with the new court or new courts.
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


The office of judicial administration shall post the list of required
information provided under this subsection on its website.
(e) In each even-numbered year, in addition to the issues assigned
under subsection (a), the interim study committee on courts and the
judiciary shall review the most recent weighted caseload measurement
system report published by the office of judicial administration and do
the following:
(1) Identify each county in which the number of courts or judicial
officers exceeds the number used by the county in that report
year.
(2) Determine the number of previous report years in which the
number of courts or judicial officers in a county identified in
subdivision (1) exceeded the number used by the county in that
particular report year.
(3) Make a recommendation on whether the number of courts or
judicial officers in the county should be decreased.
The office of judicial administration shall post a list of the number of
courts or judicial officers used in each county for each report year, and
the number of years in which the number of courts or judicial officers
in the county has exceeded the number used by the county, on its
website.
(f) In addition to studying the issues assigned under subsection (a),
the interim study committee on child services shall:
(1) review the annual reports submitted by:
(A) each local child fatality review team under IC 16-49-3-7;
(B) the statewide child fatality review committee under
IC 16-49-4-11; and
(C) the department of child services under IC 31-25-2-24;
during the immediately preceding twelve (12) month period, and
may make recommendations regarding changes in policies or
statutes to improve child safety; and
(2) report to the legislative council before November 1 of each
interim, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, the results of:
(A) the committee's review under subdivision (1); and
(B) the committee's study of any issue assigned to the
committee under subsection (a).
(g) In each even-numbered year, in addition to the issues assigned
under subsection (a), the interim study committee on government shall
do the following:
(1) Determine whether a group has met in the immediately
preceding two (2) years.
(2) Review reports submitted to the committee in accordance with
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


IC 1-1-15.5-4.
(3) Identify all interstate compacts that have been fully
operational for at least two (2) years to which the state is a party.
(4) Consider whether to:
(A) remain a party to; or
(B) withdraw from;
each interstate compact.
(5) If the committee determines that the state should withdraw
from an interstate compact, identify the steps needed to withdraw.
(6) Report before November 1 to the legislative council, in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6, the committee's:
(A) recommendations for proposed legislation to repeal
groups:
(i) that have not met during the immediately preceding two
(2) years; and or
(ii) that the committee finds should be repealed after
reviewing a the group's report under subdivision (2); and
(B) findings and recommendations regarding the interstate
compacts.
As used in this subsection, "group" refers to an authority, a board, a
commission, a committee, a council, a delegate, a foundation, a panel,
or a task force that is established by statute, has at least one (1)
legislator assigned to it, and is not staffed by the legislative services
agency.
(h) In 2026 and 2027, in addition to the issues assigned under
subsections (a) and (f), the interim study committee on child services
shall review the report submitted by the child welfare task force under
IC 2-5-55.7-8. This subsection expires December 31, 2027.
SECTION 2. IC 4-3-17 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Hoosier Alliance Against Drugs).
SECTION 3. IC 4-23-7.2-21 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 21. (a) An advisory committee is established to advise
the historical bureau in establishing an oral history of the general
assembly under section 20 of this chapter. The committee consists of
the following eight (8) members:
(1) One (1) member of the general assembly appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives.
(2) One (1) member of the general assembly appointed by the
minority leader of the house of representatives.
(3) One (1) member of the general assembly appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate.
(4) One (1) member of the general assembly appointed by the
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


minority leader of the senate.
(5) Four (4) members appointed by the governor as follows:
(A) One (1) member nominated by the Indiana library and
historical board.
(B) One (1) member nominated by the Indiana Historical
Society.
(C) One (1) member nominated by the Center for the Study of
History and Memory at Indiana University.
(D) One (1) member nominated by the board of trustees of The
History Museum in South Bend.
(b) The following apply to the governor's appointments under
subsection (a)(5):
(1) Not more than two (2) members appointed by the governor
may be members of the same political party.
(2) The appointments must be made so that the northern, central,
and southern regions of Indiana are represented on the committee.
(c) Members of the committee serve at the pleasure of the
appointing authority. If a vacancy occurs on the committee, the
appointing authority that appointed the member whose position is
vacant shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy. An individual
appointed to fill a vacancy must have the qualifications that a member
appointed by the appointing authority must have.
(d) The:
(1) chairman of the legislative council, with the advice of the
vice-chairman, shall designate the chair; and
(2) vice-chairman of the legislative council, with the advice of the
chairman, shall designate a vice-chair;
of the committee from among the legislative members of the
committee. The chair and vice-chair of the committee serve at the
pleasure of the appointing authority.
(e) Each member of the committee is entitled to receive the same
per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid to individuals who serve
as legislative and lay members, respectively, of interim study
committees established by the legislative council.
(f) The historical bureau shall provide staff support to the
committee.
(g) Expenses incurred by the committee to carry out its functions
must be paid from appropriations to the Indiana library and historical
board.
(h) On or before July 1, 2027, and July 1 biennially thereafter, the
committee shall submit a report to the executive director of the
legislative services agency, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, for
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


review by the interim committee on government in accordance with
IC 1-1-15.5-4 and IC 2-5-1.3-13(g). The report shall describe:
(1) official action taken; and
(2) actionable items considered;
by the committee during the preceding two (2) years.
SECTION 4. IC 6-1.1-20-1.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 65, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.1. (a) As used in this chapter, "controlled
project" means any project financed by bonds or a lease, except for the
following:
(1) A project for which the political subdivision reasonably
expects to pay:
(A) debt service; or
(B) lease rentals;
from funds other than property taxes that are exempt from the
levy limitations of IC 6-1.1-18.5 or (before January 1, 2009)
IC 20-45-3. A project is not a controlled project even though the
political subdivision has pledged to levy property taxes to pay the
debt service or lease rentals if those other funds are insufficient.
(2) Subject to subsection (b), A project that will not cost the
political subdivision more than the lesser of the following:
(A) An amount equal to the following:
(i) In the case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before
January 1, 2018, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, two million
dollars ($2,000,000).
(ii) In the case of an ordinance or resolution adopted after
December 31, 2017, and before January 1, 2019, making a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a
lease for the project, five million dollars ($5,000,000).
(iii) In the case of an ordinance or resolution adopted in a
calendar year after December 31, 2018, making a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a
lease for the project, an amount (as determined by the
department of local government finance) equal to the result
of the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by the amount
determined under this clause for the preceding calendar
year.
The department of local government finance shall publish the
threshold determined under item (iii) in the Indiana Register
under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60) days after the date
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


the budget agency releases the maximum levy growth quotient
for the ensuing year under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(B) An amount equal to the following:
(i) One percent (1%) of the total gross assessed value of
property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date, if that total gross assessed value is more
than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).
(ii) One million dollars ($1,000,000), if the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date is not more than one hundred
million dollars ($100,000,000).
(3) A project that is being refinanced for the purpose of providing
gross or net present value savings to taxpayers.
(4) A project for which bonds were issued or leases were entered
into before January 1, 1996, or where the state board of tax
commissioners has approved the issuance of bonds or the
execution of leases before January 1, 1996.
(5) A project that:
(A) is required by a court order holding that a federal law
mandates the project; or
(B) is in response to a court order holding that:
(i) a federal law has been violated; and
(ii) the project is to address the deficiency or violation.
(6) A project that is in response to:
(A) a natural disaster;
(B) an accident; or
(C) an emergency;
in the political subdivision that makes a building or facility
unavailable for its intended use.
(7) A project that was not a controlled project under this section
as in effect on June 30, 2008, and for which:
(A) the bonds or lease for the project were issued or entered
into before July 1, 2008; or
(B) the issuance of the bonds or the execution of the lease for
the project was approved by the department of local
government finance before July 1, 2008.
(8) A project of the Little Calumet River basin development
commission for which bonds are payable from special
assessments collected under IC 14-13-2-18.6.
(9) A project for engineering, land and right-of-way acquisition,
construction, resurfacing, maintenance, restoration, and
rehabilitation exclusively for or of:
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(A) local road and street systems, including bridges that are
designated as being in a local road and street system;
(B) arterial road and street systems, including bridges that are
designated as being in an arterial road and street system; or
(C) any combination of local and arterial road and street
systems, including designated bridges.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a project for which a public
hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been conducted under
IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2023, or to a project for which an
ordinance or resolution making a preliminary determination to issue
bonds or enter into a lease is adopted after June 30, 2025. If:
(1) a political subdivision's total debt service tax rate is more than
forty cents ($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed
value; and
(2) subsection (a)(1) and subsection (a)(3) through (a)(9) are not
applicable;
the term includes any project to be financed by bonds or a lease,
including a project that does not otherwise meet the threshold amount
provided in subsection (a)(2). This subsection expires December 31,
2025. For purposes of this subsection, a political subdivision's total
debt service tax rate does not include a tax rate imposed in a
referendum debt service tax levy approved by voters.
(c) (b) This subsection applies to a project for which an ordinance
or resolution making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease is adopted after June 30, 2025. If subsection (a)(1)
and subsection (a)(3) through (a)(9) are not applicable, the term
includes any project to be financed by bonds or a lease, including a
project that does not otherwise meet the threshold amount provided in
subsection (a)(2), if:
(1) in the case of a school corporation, the school corporation's
total debt service tax rate is more than forty cents ($0.40) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value;
(2) in the case of a city, county, or town, the city's, county's, or
town's total debt service tax rate is more than twenty-five cents
($0.25) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value; or
(3) in the case of a political subdivision not described in
subdivision (1) or (2), the political subdivision's total debt service
tax rate is more than five cents ($0.05) per one hundred dollars
($100) of assessed value.
However, this subsection does not apply to a project for which a public
hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been conducted under
IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2025. For purposes of this subsection, a
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


political subdivision's total debt service tax rate does not include a tax
rate imposed in a referendum debt service tax levy approved by voters.
SECTION 5. IC 6-1.1-20-3.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.1. (a) Subject to section 3.5(a)(1)(C) of this
chapter, this section applies only to the following:
(1) A controlled project (as defined in section 1.1 of this chapter
as in effect June 30, 2008) for which the proper officers of a
political subdivision make a preliminary determination in the
manner described in subsection (b) before July 1, 2008.
(2) An elementary school building, middle school building, high
school building, or other school building for academic instruction
that:
(A) is a controlled project;
(B) will be used for any combination of kindergarten through
grade 12; and
(C) will not cost more than the lesser of the following:
(i) The threshold amount determined under this item. In the
case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before January 1,
2018, making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease for the project, the threshold amount is ten
million dollars ($10,000,000). In the case of an ordinance or
resolution adopted after December 31, 2017, and before
January 1, 2019, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, the threshold
amount is fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000). In the case
of an ordinance or resolution adopted in a calendar year after
December 31, 2018, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, the threshold
amount is an amount (as determined by the department of
local government finance) equal to the result of the
maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by the threshold
amount determined under this item for the preceding
calendar year. In the case of a threshold amount determined
under this item that applies for a calendar year after
December 31, 2018, the department of local government
finance shall publish the threshold in the Indiana Register
under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60) days after the
date the budget agency releases the maximum levy growth
quotient for the ensuing year under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(ii) An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total gross
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date, if that total gross assessed value
is more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000), or ten
million dollars ($10,000,000), if the total gross assessed
value of property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date is not more than one billion dollars
($1,000,000,000).
(3) Any other controlled project that:
(A) is not a controlled project described in subdivision (1) or
(2); and
(B) will not cost the political subdivision more than the lesser
of the following:
(i) The threshold amount determined under this item. In the
case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before January 1,
2018, making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease for the project, the threshold amount is
twelve million dollars ($12,000,000). In the case of an
ordinance or resolution adopted after December 31, 2017,
and before January 1, 2019, making a preliminary
determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for the
project, the threshold amount is fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000). In the case of an ordinance or resolution
adopted in a calendar year after December 31, 2018, making
a preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a
lease for the project, the threshold amount is an amount (as
determined by the department of local government finance)
equal to the result of the maximum levy growth quotient
determined under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by
the threshold amount determined under this item for the
preceding calendar year. In the case of a threshold amount
determined under this item that applies for a calendar year
after December 31, 2018, the department of local
government finance shall publish the threshold in the
Indiana Register under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60)
days after the date the budget agency releases the maximum
levy growth quotient for the ensuing year under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(ii) An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date, if that total gross assessed value
is more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), or
one million dollars ($1,000,000), if the total gross assessed
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


value of property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date is not more than one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000).
(4) A controlled project funded by debt service if the scope of the
project changes from the purpose of the project initially
advertised to taxpayers as determined under section 4.2(c) of this
chapter.
(5) This subdivision does not apply to a project for which a public
hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been conducted
under IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2023, or to a project for which
an ordinance or resolution making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease is adopted after June 30, 2025.
Any other controlled project if both of the following apply:
(A) The political subdivision's total debt service tax rate is
more than forty cents ($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100)
of assessed value, but less than eighty cents ($0.80) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value.
(B) The controlled project is not otherwise described in section
3.5(a)(1) of this chapter.
This subdivision expires December 31, 2025. For purposes of this
subdivision, a political subdivision's total debt service tax rate
does not include a tax rate imposed in a referendum debt service
levy approved by voters.
(6) (5) Any other controlled project if the following apply:
(A) An ordinance or resolution making a preliminary
determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for the
project is adopted after June 30, 2025.
(B) The controlled project is not otherwise described in section
3.5(a)(1) of this chapter.
(C) In the case of a:
(i) school corporation, the school corporation's total debt
service tax rate is more than forty cents ($0.40) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value, but not more than
seventy cents ($0.70) per one hundred dollars ($100) of
assessed value;
(ii) city, county, or town, the city's, county's, or town's total
debt service tax rate is more than twenty-five cents ($0.25)
per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value, but not
more than forty cents ($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100)
of assessed value; or
(iii) political subdivision not described in item (i) or (ii), the
political subdivision's total debt service tax rate is more than
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


five cents ($0.05) per one hundred dollars ($100) of
assessed value, but not more than ten cents ($0.10) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value.
However, this subdivision does not apply to a project for which a
public hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been
conducted under IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2025. For purposes
of this subdivision, a political subdivision's total debt service tax
rate does not include a tax rate imposed in a referendum debt
service tax levy approved by voters.
(b) A political subdivision may not impose property taxes to pay
debt service on bonds or lease rentals on a lease for a controlled project
without completing the following procedures:
(1) The proper officers of a political subdivision shall publish
notice in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and send notice by first class
mail to the circuit court clerk and to any organization that delivers
to the officers, before January 1 of that year, an annual written
request for such notices of any meeting to consider adoption of a
resolution or an ordinance making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease and shall conduct at least two (2)
public hearings on a preliminary determination before adoption
of the resolution or ordinance. The political subdivision must at
each of the public hearings on the preliminary determination
allow the public to testify regarding the preliminary determination
and must make the following information available to the public
at each of the public hearings on the preliminary determination,
in addition to any other information required by law:
(A) The result of the political subdivision's current and
projected annual debt service payments divided by the net
assessed value of taxable property within the political
subdivision.
(B) The result of:
(i) the sum of the political subdivision's outstanding long
term debt plus the outstanding long term debt of other taxing
units that include any of the territory of the political
subdivision; divided by
(ii) the net assessed value of taxable property within the
political subdivision.
(C) The information specified in subdivision (3)(A) through
(3)(H).
(2) When the proper officers of a political subdivision make a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for
a controlled project, the officers shall give notice of the
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


preliminary determination by:
(A) publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1; and
(B) first class mail to the circuit court clerk and to the
organizations described in subdivision (1).
(3) A notice under subdivision (2) of the preliminary
determination of the political subdivision to issue bonds or enter
into a lease for a controlled project must include the following
information:
(A) The maximum term of the bonds or lease.
(B) The maximum principal amount of the bonds or the
maximum lease rental for the lease.
(C) The estimated interest rates that will be paid and the total
interest costs associated with the bonds or lease.
(D) The purpose of the bonds or lease.
(E) A statement that any owners of property within the
political subdivision or registered voters residing within the
political subdivision who want to initiate a petition and
remonstrance process against the proposed debt service or
lease payments must file a petition that complies with
subdivisions (4) and (5) not later than thirty (30) days after
publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1.
(F) With respect to bonds issued or a lease entered into to
open:
(i) a new school facility; or
(ii) an existing facility that has not been used for at least
three (3) years and that is being reopened to provide
additional classroom space;
the estimated costs the school corporation expects to incur
annually to operate the facility.
(G) A statement of whether the school corporation expects to
appeal for a new facility adjustment (as defined in
IC 20-45-1-16 (repealed) before January 1, 2009) for an
increased maximum permissible tuition support levy to pay the
estimated costs described in clause (F).
(H) The following information:
(i) The political subdivision's current debt service levy and
rate.
(ii) The estimated increase to the political subdivision's debt
service levy and rate that will result if the political
subdivision issues the bonds or enters into the lease.
(iii) The estimated amount of the political subdivision's debt
service levy and rate that will result during the following ten
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(10) years if the political subdivision issues the bonds or
enters into the lease, after also considering any changes that
will occur to the debt service levy and rate during that
period on account of any outstanding bonds or lease
obligations that will mature or terminate during that period.
(I) The information specified in subdivision (1)(A) through
(1)(B).
(4) After notice is given, a petition requesting the application of
a petition and remonstrance process may be filed by the lesser of:
(A) five hundred (500) persons who are either owners of
property within the political subdivision or registered voters
residing within the political subdivision; or
(B) five percent (5%) of the registered voters residing within
the political subdivision.
(5) The state board of accounts shall design and, upon request by
the county voter registration office, deliver to the county voter
registration office or the county voter registration office's
designated printer the petition forms to be used solely in the
petition process described in this section. The county voter
registration office shall issue to an owner or owners of property
within the political subdivision or a registered voter residing
within the political subdivision the number of petition forms
requested by the owner or owners or the registered voter. Each
form must be accompanied by instructions detailing the
requirements that:
(A) the carrier and signers must be owners of property or
registered voters;
(B) the carrier must be a signatory on at least one (1) petition;
(C) after the signatures have been collected, the carrier must
swear or affirm before a notary public that the carrier
witnessed each signature; and
(D) govern the closing date for the petition period.
Persons requesting forms may be required to identify themselves
as owners of property or registered voters and may be allowed to
pick up additional copies to distribute to other owners of property
or registered voters. Each person signing a petition must indicate
whether the person is signing the petition as a registered voter
within the political subdivision or is signing the petition as the
owner of property within the political subdivision. A person who
signs a petition as a registered voter must indicate the address at
which the person is registered to vote. A person who signs a
petition as an owner of property must indicate the address of the
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


property owned by the person in the political subdivision.
(6) Each petition must be verified under oath by at least one (1)
qualified petitioner in a manner prescribed by the state board of
accounts before the petition is filed with the county voter
registration office under subdivision (7).
(7) Each petition must be filed with the county voter registration
office not more than thirty (30) days after publication under
subdivision (2) of the notice of the preliminary determination.
(8) The county voter registration office shall determine whether
each person who signed the petition is a registered voter.
However, after the county voter registration office has determined
that at least five hundred twenty-five (525) persons who signed
the petition are registered voters within the political subdivision,
the county voter registration office is not required to verify
whether the remaining persons who signed the petition are
registered voters. If the county voter registration office does not
determine that at least five hundred twenty-five (525) persons
who signed the petition are registered voters, the county voter
registration office shall, not more than fifteen (15) business days
after receiving a petition, forward a copy of the petition to the
county auditor. Not more than ten (10) business days after
receiving the copy of the petition, the county auditor shall provide
to the county voter registration office a statement verifying:
(A) whether a person who signed the petition as a registered
voter but is not a registered voter, as determined by the county
voter registration office, is the owner of property in the
political subdivision; and
(B) whether a person who signed the petition as an owner of
property within the political subdivision does in fact own
property within the political subdivision.
(9) The county voter registration office, not more than ten (10)
business days after determining that at least five hundred
twenty-five (525) persons who signed the petition are registered
voters or receiving the statement from the county auditor under
subdivision (8), as applicable, shall make the final determination
of the number of petitioners that are registered voters in the
political subdivision and, based on the statement provided by the
county auditor, the number of petitioners that own property within
the political subdivision. Whenever the name of an individual
who signs a petition form as a registered voter contains a minor
variation from the name of the registered voter as set forth in the
records of the county voter registration office, the signature is
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


presumed to be valid, and there is a presumption that the
individual is entitled to sign the petition under this section. Except
as otherwise provided in this chapter, in determining whether an
individual is a registered voter, the county voter registration office
shall apply the requirements and procedures used under IC 3 to
determine whether a person is a registered voter for purposes of
voting in an election governed by IC 3. However, an individual is
not required to comply with the provisions concerning providing
proof of identification to be considered a registered voter for
purposes of this chapter. A person is entitled to sign a petition
only one (1) time in a particular petition and remonstrance
process under this chapter, regardless of whether the person owns
more than one (1) parcel of real property, mobile home assessed
as personal property, or manufactured home assessed as personal
property, or a combination of those types of property within the
subdivision and regardless of whether the person is both a
registered voter in the political subdivision and the owner of
property within the political subdivision. Notwithstanding any
other provision of this section, if a petition is presented to the
county voter registration office within forty-five (45) days before
an election, the county voter registration office may defer acting
on the petition, and the time requirements under this section for
action by the county voter registration office do not begin to run
until five (5) days after the date of the election.
(10) The county voter registration office must file a certificate and
each petition with:
(A) the township trustee, if the political subdivision is a
township, who shall present the petition or petitions to the
township board; or
(B) the body that has the authority to authorize the issuance of
the bonds or the execution of a lease, if the political
subdivision is not a township;
within thirty-five (35) business days of the filing of the petition
requesting a petition and remonstrance process. The certificate
must state the number of petitioners that are owners of property
within the political subdivision and the number of petitioners who
are registered voters residing within the political subdivision.
If a sufficient petition requesting a petition and remonstrance process
is not filed by owners of property or registered voters as set forth in this
section, the political subdivision may issue bonds or enter into a lease
by following the provisions of law relating to the bonds to be issued or
lease to be entered into.
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(c) A political subdivision may not divide a controlled project in
order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this
chapter. A person that owns property within a political subdivision or
a person that is a registered voter residing within a political subdivision
may file a petition with the department of local government finance
objecting that the political subdivision has divided a controlled project
in order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this
chapter. The petition must be filed not more than ten (10) days after the
political subdivision gives notice of the political subdivision's decision
to issue bonds or enter into leases for a capital project that the person
believes is the result of a division of a controlled project that is
prohibited by this subsection. If the department of local government
finance receives a petition under this subsection, the department shall
not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the petition make a final
determination on the issue of whether the political subdivision divided
a controlled project in order to avoid the requirements of this section
and section 3.2 of this chapter. If the department of local government
finance determines that a political subdivision divided a controlled
project in order to avoid the requirements of this section and section
3.2 of this chapter and the political subdivision continues to desire to
proceed with the project, the political subdivision shall fulfill the
requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this chapter, if
applicable, regardless of the cost of the project in dispute. A political
subdivision shall be considered to have divided a capital project in
order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this
chapter if the result of one (1) or more of the subprojects cannot
reasonably be considered an independently desirable end in itself
without reference to another capital project. This subsection does not
prohibit a political subdivision from undertaking a series of capital
projects in which the result of each capital project can reasonably be
considered an independently desirable end in itself without reference
to another capital project.
SECTION 6. IC 6-1.1-20-3.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) This section applies only to a controlled
project that meets the following conditions:
(1) The controlled project is described in one (1) of the following
categories:
(A) An elementary school building, middle school building,
high school building, or other school building for academic
instruction that will be used for any combination of
kindergarten through grade 12 and will cost more than the
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


lesser of the following:
(i) The threshold amount determined under this item. In the
case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before January 1,
2018, making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease for the project, the threshold amount is ten
million dollars ($10,000,000). In the case of an ordinance or
resolution adopted after December 31, 2017, and before
January 1, 2019, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, the threshold
amount is fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000). In the case
of an ordinance or resolution adopted in a calendar year after
December 31, 2018, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, the threshold
amount is an amount (as determined by the department of
local government finance) equal to the result of the
maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by the threshold
amount determined under this item for the preceding
calendar year. In the case of a threshold amount determined
under this item that applies for a calendar year after
December 31, 2018, the department of local government
finance shall publish the threshold in the Indiana Register
under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60) days after the
date the budget agency releases the maximum levy growth
quotient for the ensuing year under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(ii) An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date, if that total gross assessed value
is more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000), or ten
million dollars ($10,000,000), if the total gross assessed
value of property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date is not more than one billion dollars
($1,000,000,000).
(B) Any other controlled project that is not a controlled project
described in clause (A) and will cost the political subdivision
more than the lesser of the following:
(i) The threshold amount determined under this item. In the
case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before January 1,
2018, making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease for the project, the threshold amount is
twelve million dollars ($12,000,000). In the case of an
ordinance or resolution adopted after December 31, 2017,
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


and before January 1, 2019, making a preliminary
determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for the
project, the threshold amount is fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000). In the case of an ordinance or resolution
adopted in a calendar year after December 31, 2018, making
a preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a
lease for the project, the threshold amount is an amount (as
determined by the department of local government finance)
equal to the result of the maximum levy growth quotient
determined under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by
the threshold amount determined under this item for the
preceding calendar year. In the case of a threshold amount
determined under this item that applies for a calendar year
after December 31, 2018, the department of local
government finance shall publish the threshold in the
Indiana Register under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60)
days after the date the budget agency releases the maximum
levy growth quotient for the ensuing year under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(ii) An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date, if that total gross assessed value
is more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), or
one million dollars ($1,000,000), if the total gross assessed
value of property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date is not more than one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000).
(C) Any other controlled project for which a political
subdivision adopts an ordinance or resolution making a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease
for the project, if the sum of:
(i) the cost of that controlled project; plus
(ii) the costs of all other controlled projects for which the
political subdivision has previously adopted within the
preceding three hundred sixty-five (365) days an ordinance
or resolution making a preliminary determination to issue
bonds or enter into a lease for those other controlled
projects;
exceeds twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).
(D) A controlled project funded by debt service if the scope of
the project changes from the purpose of the project initially
advertised to taxpayers as determined under section 4.3(c) of
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


this chapter.
(E) This clause does not apply to a project for which a public
hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been conducted
under IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2023, or to a project for
which an ordinance or resolution making a preliminary
determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease is adopted
after June 30, 2025. Except as provided in section 4.5 of this
chapter, any other controlled project if the political
subdivision's total debt service tax rate is at least eighty cents
($0.80) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value. This
clause expires December 31, 2025. For purposes of this clause,
a political subdivision's total debt service tax rate does not
include a tax rate imposed in a referendum debt service tax
levy approved by voters.
(F) (E) Except as provided in section 4.5 of this chapter, any
other project for which an ordinance or resolution making a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease
is adopted after June 30, 2025, if:
(i) in the case of a school corporation, the school
corporation's total debt service tax rate is more than seventy
cents ($0.70) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed
value;
(ii) in the case of a city, county, or town, the city's, county's,
or town's total debt service tax rate is more than forty cents
($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value; or
(iii) in the case of a political subdivision not described in
item (i) or (ii), the political subdivision's total debt service
tax rate is more than ten cents ($0.10) per one hundred
dollars ($100) of assessed value.
However, this clause does not apply to a project for which a
public hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been
conducted under IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2025. For
purposes of this clause, a political subdivision's total debt
service tax rate does not include a tax rate imposed in a
referendum debt service tax levy approved by voters.
(2) The proper officers of the political subdivision make a
preliminary determination after June 30, 2008, in the manner
described in subsection (b) to issue bonds or enter into a lease for
the controlled project.
(b) Subject to subsection (d), a political subdivision may not impose
property taxes to pay debt service on bonds or lease rentals on a lease
for a controlled project without completing the following procedures:
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(1) The proper officers of a political subdivision shall publish
notice in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and send notice by first class
mail to the circuit court clerk and to any organization that delivers
to the officers, before January 1 of that year, an annual written
request for notices of any meeting to consider the adoption of an
ordinance or a resolution making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease and shall conduct at least two (2)
public hearings on the preliminary determination before adoption
of the ordinance or resolution. The political subdivision must at
each of the public hearings on the preliminary determination
allow the public to testify regarding the preliminary determination
and must make the following information available to the public
at each of the public hearings on the preliminary determination,
in addition to any other information required by law:
(A) The result of the political subdivision's current and
projected annual debt service payments divided by the net
assessed value of taxable property within the political
subdivision.
(B) The result of:
(i) the sum of the political subdivision's outstanding long
term debt plus the outstanding long term debt of other taxing
units that include any of the territory of the political
subdivision; divided by
(ii) the net assessed value of taxable property within the
political subdivision.
(C) The information specified in subdivision (3)(A) through
(3)(G).
(2) If the proper officers of a political subdivision make a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease, the
officers shall give notice of the preliminary determination by:
(A) publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1; and
(B) first class mail to the circuit court clerk and to the
organizations described in subdivision (1).
(3) A notice under subdivision (2) of the preliminary
determination of the political subdivision to issue bonds or enter
into a lease must include the following information:
(A) The maximum term of the bonds or lease.
(B) The maximum principal amount of the bonds or the
maximum lease rental for the lease.
(C) The estimated interest rates that will be paid and the total
interest costs associated with the bonds or lease.
(D) The purpose of the bonds or lease.
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(E) A statement that the proposed debt service or lease
payments must be approved in an election on a local public
question held under section 3.6 of this chapter.
(F) With respect to bonds issued or a lease entered into to
open:
(i) a new school facility; or
(ii) an existing facility that has not been used for at least
three (3) years and that is being reopened to provide
additional classroom space;
the estimated costs the school corporation expects to annually
incur to operate the facility.
(G) The following information:
(i) The political subdivision's current debt service levy and
rate.
(ii) The estimated increase to the political subdivision's debt
service levy and rate that will result if the political
subdivision issues the bonds or enters into the lease.
(iii) The estimated amount of the political subdivision's debt
service levy and rate that will result during the following ten
(10) years if the political subdivision issues the bonds or
enters into the lease, after also considering any changes that
will occur to the debt service levy and rate during that
period on account of any outstanding bonds or lease
obligations that will mature or terminate during that period.
(H) The information specified in subdivision (1)(A) through
(1)(B).
(4) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E). (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). After notice is given, a petition requesting
the application of the local public question process under section
3.6 of this chapter may be filed by the lesser of:
(A) five hundred (500) persons who are either owners of
property within the political subdivision or registered voters
residing within the political subdivision; or
(B) five percent (5%) of the registered voters residing within
the political subdivision.
(5) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E). (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). The state board of accounts shall design and,
upon request by the county voter registration office, deliver to the
county voter registration office or the county voter registration
office's designated printer the petition forms to be used solely in
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


the petition process described in this section. The county voter
registration office shall issue to an owner or owners of property
within the political subdivision or a registered voter residing
within the political subdivision the number of petition forms
requested by the owner or owners or the registered voter. Each
form must be accompanied by instructions detailing the
requirements that:
(A) the carrier and signers must be owners of property or
registered voters;
(B) the carrier must be a signatory on at least one (1) petition;
(C) after the signatures have been collected, the carrier must
swear or affirm before a notary public that the carrier
witnessed each signature; and
(D) govern the closing date for the petition period.
Persons requesting forms may be required to identify themselves
as owners of property or registered voters and may be allowed to
pick up additional copies to distribute to other owners of property
or registered voters. Each person signing a petition must indicate
whether the person is signing the petition as a registered voter
within the political subdivision or is signing the petition as the
owner of property within the political subdivision. A person who
signs a petition as a registered voter must indicate the address at
which the person is registered to vote. A person who signs a
petition as an owner of property must indicate the address of the
property owned by the person in the political subdivision.
(6) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E). (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). Each petition must be verified under oath by
at least one (1) qualified petitioner in a manner prescribed by the
state board of accounts before the petition is filed with the county
voter registration office under subdivision (7).
(7) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E). (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). Each petition must be filed with the county
voter registration office not more than thirty (30) days after
publication under subdivision (2) of the notice of the preliminary
determination.
(8) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E). (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). The county voter registration office shall
determine whether each person who signed the petition is a
registered voter. However, after the county voter registration
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


office has determined that at least five hundred twenty-five (525)
persons who signed the petition are registered voters within the
political subdivision, the county voter registration office is not
required to verify whether the remaining persons who signed the
petition are registered voters. If the county voter registration
office does not determine that at least five hundred twenty-five
(525) persons who signed the petition are registered voters, the
county voter registration office, not more than fifteen (15)
business days after receiving a petition, shall forward a copy of
the petition to the county auditor. Not more than ten (10) business
days after receiving the copy of the petition, the county auditor
shall provide to the county voter registration office a statement
verifying:
(A) whether a person who signed the petition as a registered
voter but is not a registered voter, as determined by the county
voter registration office, is the owner of property in the
political subdivision; and
(B) whether a person who signed the petition as an owner of
property within the political subdivision does in fact own
property within the political subdivision.
(9) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E). (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). The county voter registration office, not
more than ten (10) business days after determining that at least
five hundred twenty-five (525) persons who signed the petition
are registered voters or after receiving the statement from the
county auditor under subdivision (8), as applicable, shall make
the final determination of whether a sufficient number of persons
have signed the petition. Whenever the name of an individual who
signs a petition form as a registered voter contains a minor
variation from the name of the registered voter as set forth in the
records of the county voter registration office, the signature is
presumed to be valid, and there is a presumption that the
individual is entitled to sign the petition under this section. Except
as otherwise provided in this chapter, in determining whether an
individual is a registered voter, the county voter registration office
shall apply the requirements and procedures used under IC 3 to
determine whether a person is a registered voter for purposes of
voting in an election governed by IC 3. However, an individual is
not required to comply with the provisions concerning providing
proof of identification to be considered a registered voter for
purposes of this chapter. A person is entitled to sign a petition
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


only one (1) time in a particular referendum process under this
chapter, regardless of whether the person owns more than one (1)
parcel of real property, mobile home assessed as personal
property, or manufactured home assessed as personal property or
a combination of those types of property within the political
subdivision and regardless of whether the person is both a
registered voter in the political subdivision and the owner of
property within the political subdivision. Notwithstanding any
other provision of this section, if a petition is presented to the
county voter registration office within forty-five (45) days before
an election, the county voter registration office may defer acting
on the petition, and the time requirements under this section for
action by the county voter registration office do not begin to run
until five (5) days after the date of the election.
(10) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E). (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). The county voter registration office must file
a certificate and each petition with:
(A) the township trustee, if the political subdivision is a
township, who shall present the petition or petitions to the
township board; or
(B) the body that has the authority to authorize the issuance of
the bonds or the execution of a lease, if the political
subdivision is not a township;
within thirty-five (35) business days of the filing of the petition
requesting the referendum process. The certificate must state the
number of petitioners who are owners of property within the
political subdivision and the number of petitioners who are
registered voters residing within the political subdivision.
(11) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E). (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). If a sufficient petition requesting the local
public question process is not filed by owners of property or
registered voters as set forth in this section, the political
subdivision may issue bonds or enter into a lease by following the
provisions of law relating to the bonds to be issued or lease to be
entered into.
(c) If the proper officers of a political subdivision make a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease, the
officers shall provide to the county auditor:
(1) a copy of the notice required by subsection (b)(2); and
(2) any other information the county auditor requires to fulfill the
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


county auditor's duties under section 3.6 of this chapter.
(d) In addition to the procedures in subsection (b), if any capital
improvement components addressed in the most recent:
(1) threat assessment of the buildings within the school
corporation; or
(2) school safety plan (as described in IC 20-26-18.2-2(b));
concerning a particular school have not been completed or require
additional funding to be completed, before the school corporation may
impose property taxes to pay debt service on bonds or lease rentals for
a lease for a controlled project, and in addition to any other components
of the controlled project, the controlled project must include any capital
improvements necessary to complete those components described in
subdivisions (1) and (2) that have not been completed or that require
additional funding to be completed.
(e) In addition to the other procedures in this section, an ordinance
or resolution making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into leases that is considered for adoption must include a
statement of:
(1) the maximum annual debt service for the controlled project for
each year in which the debt service will be paid; and
(2) the schedule of the estimated annual tax levy and rate over a
ten (10) year period;
factoring in changes that will occur to the debt service levy and tax rate
during the period on account of any outstanding bonds or lease
obligations that will mature or terminate during the period.
SECTION 7. IC 6-1.1-20-3.6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.6. (a) Except as provided in sections 3.7 and 3.8
of this chapter, this section applies only to a controlled project
described in section 3.5(a) of this chapter.
(b) In the case of a controlled project:
(1) described in section 3.5(a)(1)(A) through 3.5(a)(1)(C) of this
chapter, if a sufficient petition requesting the application of the
local public question process has been filed as set forth in section
3.5 of this chapter; or
(2) described in section 3.5(a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or
3.5(a)(1)(F) of this chapter;
a political subdivision may not impose property taxes to pay debt
service on bonds or lease rentals on a lease for a controlled project
unless the political subdivision's proposed debt service or lease rental
is approved in an election on a local public question held under this
section.
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(c) Except as provided in subsection (k), the following question
shall be submitted to the eligible voters at the election conducted under
this section:
"Shall ________ (insert the name of the political subdivision)
increase property taxes paid to the _______ (insert the type of
political subdivision) for no more than ______ (insert the number
of years immediately following the holding of the referendum)
years for the purpose of funding _______ (insert a brief
description of the project use or purpose) for which the principal
debt amount for the project will cost no more than ______ (insert
the total cost of the project principal amount) and the financing
cost including interest and fees will cost no more than an
additional ______ (insert the total financing costs including
interest and fees) and is estimated to increase the property taxes
paid to the ______ (insert the type of political subdivision) by
imposing a property tax rate that results in a maximum annual
amount that does not exceed ______ (insert maximum amount of
annual levy). If this capital referendum public question is
approved by the voters, for a median residence of ______ (insert
the political subdivision's median household assessed value,
rounded up to the next fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)), the
property's annual property tax bill would increase by ______
(insert dollar amount, rounded up to the next whole dollar) per
year.".
The public question must appear on the ballot in the form approved by
the county election board. If the political subdivision proposing to issue
bonds or enter into a lease is located in more than one (1) county, the
county election board of each county shall jointly approve the form of
the public question that will appear on the ballot in each county. The
form approved by the county election board may differ from the
language certified to the county election board by the county auditor.
If the county election board approves the language of a public question
under this subsection, the county election board shall submit the
language and the certification of the county auditor to the department
of local government finance for review.
(d) The department of local government finance shall review the
language of the public question to evaluate whether the description of
the controlled project is accurate and is not biased against either a vote
in favor of the controlled project or a vote against the controlled
project. The department of local government finance may either
approve the ballot language as submitted or recommend that the ballot
language be modified as necessary to ensure that the description of the
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


controlled project is accurate and is not biased. The department of local
government finance shall certify its approval or recommendations to
the county auditor and the county election board not more than ten (10)
days after the language of the public question is submitted to the
department for review. If the department of local government finance
recommends a modification to the ballot language, the county election
board shall, after reviewing the recommendations of the department of
local government finance, submit modified ballot language to the
department for the department's approval or recommendation of any
additional modifications. The public question may not be certified by
the county auditor under subsection (e) unless the department of local
government finance has first certified the department's final approval
of the ballot language for the public question.
(e) The county auditor shall certify the finally approved public
question to the county election board of each county in which the
political subdivision is located. The certification must occur not later
than noon August 1. Subject to the certification requirements and
deadlines under this subsection and except as provided in subsection
(j), the public question shall be placed on the ballot at the next general
election.
(f) The circuit court clerk shall certify the results of the public
question to the following:
(1) The county auditor of each county in which the political
subdivision is located.
(2) The department of local government finance.
(g) Subject to the requirements of IC 6-1.1-18.5-8, the political
subdivision may issue the proposed bonds or enter into the proposed
lease rental if a majority of the eligible voters voting on the public
question vote in favor of the public question.
(h) If a majority of the eligible voters voting on the public question
vote in opposition to the public question, both of the following apply:
(1) The political subdivision may not issue the proposed bonds or
enter into the proposed lease rental.
(2) Another public question under this section on the same or a
substantially similar project may not be submitted to the voters
earlier than:
(A) except as provided in clause (B), seven hundred (700)
days after the date of the public question; or
(B) three hundred fifty (350) days after the date of the election,
if a petition that meets the requirements of subsection (m) is
submitted to the county auditor.
(i) IC 3, to the extent not inconsistent with this section, applies to an
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


election held under this section.
(j) A political subdivision may not divide a controlled project in
order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.5 of this
chapter. A person that owns property within a political subdivision or
a person that is a registered voter residing within a political subdivision
may file a petition with the department of local government finance
objecting that the political subdivision has divided a controlled project
into two (2) or more capital projects in order to avoid the requirements
of this section and section 3.5 of this chapter. The petition must be filed
not more than ten (10) days after the political subdivision gives notice
of the political subdivision's decision under section 3.5 of this chapter
or a determination under section 5 of this chapter to issue bonds or
enter into leases for a capital project that the person believes is the
result of a division of a controlled project that is prohibited by this
subsection. If the department of local government finance receives a
petition under this subsection, the department shall not later than thirty
(30) days after receiving the petition make a final determination on the
issue of whether the political subdivision divided a controlled project
in order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.5 of this
chapter. If the department of local government finance determines that
a political subdivision divided a controlled project in order to avoid the
requirements of this section and section 3.5 of this chapter and the
political subdivision continues to desire to proceed with the project, the
political subdivision may appeal the determination of the department
of local government finance to the Indiana board of tax review. A
political subdivision shall be considered to have divided a capital
project in order to avoid the requirements of this section and section
3.5 of this chapter if the result of one (1) or more of the subprojects
cannot reasonably be considered an independently desirable end in
itself without reference to another capital project. This subsection does
not prohibit a political subdivision from undertaking a series of capital
projects in which the result of each capital project can reasonably be
considered an independently desirable end in itself without reference
to another capital project.
(k) This subsection applies to a political subdivision for which a
petition requesting a public question has been submitted under section
3.5 of this chapter. The legislative body (as defined in IC 36-1-2-9) of
the political subdivision may adopt a resolution to withdraw a
controlled project from consideration in a public question. If the
legislative body provides a certified copy of the resolution to the county
auditor and the county election board not later than sixty-three (63)
days before the election at which the public question would be on the
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


ballot, the public question on the controlled project shall not be placed
on the ballot and the public question on the controlled project shall not
be held, regardless of whether the county auditor has certified the
public question to the county election board. If the withdrawal of a
public question under this subsection requires the county election
board to reprint ballots, the political subdivision withdrawing the
public question shall pay the costs of reprinting the ballots. If a political
subdivision withdraws a public question under this subsection that
would have been held at a special election and the county election
board has printed the ballots before the legislative body of the political
subdivision provides a certified copy of the withdrawal resolution to
the county auditor and the county election board, the political
subdivision withdrawing the public question shall pay the costs
incurred by the county in printing the ballots. If a public question on a
controlled project is withdrawn under this subsection, a public question
under this section on the same controlled project or a substantially
similar controlled project may not be submitted to the voters earlier
than three hundred fifty (350) days after the date the resolution
withdrawing the public question is adopted.
(l) If a public question regarding a controlled project is placed on
the ballot to be voted on at an election under this section, the political
subdivision shall submit to the department of local government finance,
at least thirty (30) days before the election, the following information
regarding the proposed controlled project for posting on the
department's website:
(1) The cost per square foot of any buildings being constructed as
part of the controlled project.
(2) The effect that approval of the controlled project would have
on the political subdivision's property tax rate.
(3) The maximum term of the bonds or lease.
(4) The maximum principal amount of the bonds or the maximum
lease rental for the lease.
(5) The estimated interest rates that will be paid and the total
interest costs associated with the bonds or lease.
(6) The purpose of the bonds or lease.
(7) In the case of a controlled project proposed by a school
corporation:
(A) the current and proposed square footage of school building
space per student;
(B) enrollment patterns within the school corporation; and
(C) the age and condition of the current school facilities.
(m) If a majority of the eligible voters voting on the public question
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


vote in opposition to the public question, a petition may be submitted
to the county auditor to request that the limit under subsection
(h)(2)(B) apply to the holding of a subsequent public question by the
political subdivision. If such a petition is submitted to the county
auditor and is signed by the lesser of:
(1) five hundred (500) persons who are either owners of property
within the political subdivision or registered voters residing
within the political subdivision; or
(2) five percent (5%) of the registered voters residing within the
political subdivision;
the limit under subsection (h)(2)(B) applies to the holding of a second
public question by the political subdivision and the limit under
subsection (h)(2)(A) does not apply to the holding of a second public
question by the political subdivision.
SECTION 8. IC 6-1.1-20-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 71, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) As used in this section, "maintenance
emergency" refers to a response to a condition that is not otherwise
subject to the application of section 1.1(a)(6) of this chapter and
includes:
(1) repair of a boiler or chiller system;
(2) roof repair;
(3) storm damage repair; or
(4) any other repair that the department determines is a
maintenance emergency for which waiver of the application of
section 3.5(a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or 3.5(a)(1)(F) of this
chapter is warranted.
(b) A political subdivision may submit a request to the department
to waive the application of section 3.5(a)(1)(E) (before its expiration)
or 3.5(a)(1)(F) of this chapter, if the proposed controlled project of the
political subdivision is to address a maintenance emergency with
respect to a building owned or leased by the political subdivision.
(c) The department shall require the political subdivision to submit
any information that the department considers necessary to determine
whether the condition that the political subdivision contends is a
maintenance emergency.
(d) The department shall review a request and issue a determination
not later than forty-five (45) days after the department receives a
request under this section determining whether the condition that the
political subdivision contends is a maintenance emergency is sufficient
to waive the application of section 3.5(a)(1)(E) (before its expiration)
or 3.5(a)(1)(F) of this chapter. If the department determines that the
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


condition is a maintenance emergency then section 3.5(a)(1)(E) (before
its expiration) or 3.5(a)(1)(F) of this chapter is waived and does not
apply to the proposed controlled project.
(e) A waiver of the application of section 3.5(a)(1)(E) (before its
expiration) or 3.5(a)(1)(F) of this chapter in accordance with this
section may not be construed as a waiver of any other requirement of
this chapter with respect to the proposed controlled project.
SECTION 9. IC 6-1.1-30-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 178, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (c) and subject to subsection (d), the department of state
revenue and the state comptroller shall, when requested by the
department of local government finance, withhold a percentage of the
distributions of local income tax revenue under IC 6-3.6-9, if:
(1) the county assessor has not transmitted to the department of
local government finance by October 1 of the year in which the
distribution is scheduled to be made the data for all townships in
the county required to be transmitted under IC 6-1.1-4-25;
(2) the county auditor has not paid a bill for services under
IC 6-1.1-4-31.5 to the department of local government finance in
a timely manner;
(3) the county assessor has not forwarded to the department of
local government finance in a timely manner sales disclosure
form data under IC 6-1.1-5.5-3;
(4) the county auditor has not forwarded to the department of
local government finance the duplicate copies of all approved
exemption applications required to be forwarded by that date
under IC 6-1.1-11-8(a);
(5) by the date the distribution is scheduled to be made, the
county auditor has not sent a certified statement required to be
sent by that date under IC 6-1.1-17-1 to the department of local
government finance;
(6) the county does not maintain a certified computer system that
meets the requirements of IC 6-1.1-31.5-3.5;
(7) the county auditor has not transmitted the data described in
IC 36-2-9-20 to the department of local government finance in the
form and on the schedule specified by IC 36-2-9-20;
(8) the county has not established a parcel index numbering
system under 50 IAC 26-8-1 in a timely manner; or
(9) a county official has not provided other information to the
department of local government finance in a timely manner as
required by the department of local government finance. or
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(10) the department of local government finance incurs additional
costs to assist a covered county (as defined in IC 6-1.1-22.6-1) to
issue tax statements within the time frame specified in
IC 6-1.1-22.6-18(b) for each year that the county experienced
delayed property taxes (as defined in IC 6-1.1-22.6-2) before the
year in which the county qualifies as a covered county.
The percentage to be withheld is the percentage determined by the
department of local government finance. However, the percentage
withheld for a reason stated in subdivision (10) may not exceed the
percentage needed to reimburse the department of local government
finance for the costs incurred by the department of local government
finance to take the actions necessary to permit a covered county (as
defined in IC 6-1.1-22.6-1) to issue reconciling tax statements for prior
year delayed property taxes (as defined in IC 6-1.1-22.6-2) within the
time frame specified in IC 6-1.1-22.6-18(b). The county governmental
taxing unit of a covered county (as defined in IC 6-1.1-22.6-1) shall
reimburse the department of local government finance for these
expenses. The amount withheld under subdivision (10) reduces only
the amount that would otherwise be distributed to the county
governmental taxing unit of a covered county (as defined in
IC 6-1.1-22.6-1) and not money distributable to any other political
subdivision. The withholding of an amount under subdivision (10) does
not relieve the county government of a covered county (as defined in
IC 6-1.1-22.6-1) from making bond or lease payments that would
otherwise be paid from withheld amounts or providing property tax
credits that would otherwise be provided under IC 6-3.6 from withheld
amounts. Subdivision (10) does not apply to any county other than a
covered county (as defined in IC 6-1.1-22.6-1).
(b) Except as provided in subsection (e), money not distributed for
the reasons stated in subsection (a) shall be distributed to the county
when the department of local government finance determines that the
failure to:
(1) provide information; or
(2) pay a bill for services;
has been corrected.
(c) The restrictions on distributions under subsection (a) do not
apply if the department of local government finance determines that the
failure to:
(1) provide information; or
(2) pay a bill for services;
in a timely manner is justified by unusual circumstances.
(d) The department of local government finance shall give the
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


county auditor at least thirty (30) days notice in writing before the
department of state revenue or the state comptroller withholds a
distribution under subsection (a).
(e) Money not distributed for the reason stated in subsection (a)(2)
may be deposited in the fund established by IC 6-1.1-5.5-4.7(a). Money
deposited under this subsection is not subject to distribution under
subsection (b).
(f) This subsection applies to a county that will not receive a
distribution of local income tax revenue under IC 6-3.6-9. At the
request of the department of local government finance, an amount
permitted to be withheld under subsection (a) may be withheld from
any state revenues that would otherwise be distributed to the county or
one (1) or more taxing units in the county.
SECTION 10. IC 6-3.1-26-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.165-2021,
SECTION 88, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) Subject to subsection (d) and (g), (d), a
taxpayer may carry forward an unused credit for the number of years
determined by the corporation, not to exceed nine (9) consecutive
taxable years, beginning with the taxable year after the taxable year in
which the taxpayer makes the qualified investment.
(b) The amount that a taxpayer may carry forward to a particular
taxable year under this section equals the unused part of a tax credit
allowed under this chapter.
(c) A taxpayer may:
(1) claim a tax credit under this chapter for a qualified
investment; and
(2) carry forward a remainder for one (1) or more different
qualified investments;
in the same taxable year.
(d) This subsection applies only to a taxpayer that:
(1) is not a pass through entity;
(2) proposes at least five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000)
in total investment over a five (5) year period; and
(3) enters into a written agreement with the corporation under this
subsection before January 1, 2017, and agrees to claim tax credits
under this chapter for not more than one hundred seventy million
dollars ($170,000,000) of qualified investment that is made as
part of the investment proposed as described in subdivision (2).
If a tax credit awarded under this chapter exceeds a taxpayer's state
income tax liability for the taxable year, notwithstanding subsection
(a), the corporation may accelerate to that taxable year the excess
amount of the tax credit that could otherwise be carried forward under
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


subsection (a). The excess amount of the tax credit accelerated under
this subsection shall be discounted as determined under a written
agreement entered into by the taxpayer and the corporation. The
discounted amount of the excess tax credit accelerated under this
subsection as determined by the corporation may be remitted to the
taxpayer as provided in the written agreement between the corporation
and the taxpayer. Subject to subsection (f), the total amount of qualified
investments for which tax credits may be accelerated under this
subsection may not exceed one hundred seventy million dollars
($170,000,000). The requirement for an agreement under section
21(11) of this chapter does not apply to this subsection. This subsection
expires December 31, 2025.
(e) A written agreement under subsection (d) may contain a
provision for payment of liquidated damages:
(1) to the corporation for failure to comply with the conditions set
forth in this chapter and the agreement entered into by the
corporation and taxpayer under this chapter; and
(2) that are in addition to an assessment made by the department
for noncompliance under section 23 of this chapter.
This subsection expires December 31, 2025.
(f) The total aggregated amount of tax credits that the corporation
may discount under subsection (d) and section 16(d) of this chapter in
a state fiscal year may not exceed seventeen million dollars
($17,000,000), as determined before the discount is applied. This
subsection expires December 31, 2025.
(g) (d) This subsection applies only to a taxpayer that:
(1) is not a pass through entity;
(2) proposes at least two hundred fifty million dollars
($250,000,000) in total investment over a five (5) year period; and
(3) enters into a written agreement with the corporation under this
subsection before July 1, 2022, and agrees to claim tax credits
under this chapter for not more than one hundred seventy million
dollars ($170,000,000) of qualified investment that is made as
part of the investment proposed as described in subdivision (2).
If a tax credit awarded under this chapter exceeds a taxpayer's state
income tax liability for the taxable year, notwithstanding subsection
(a), the corporation may accelerate to that taxable year the excess
amount of the tax credit that could otherwise be carried forward under
subsection (a). The excess amount of the tax credit accelerated under
this subsection shall be discounted as determined under a written
agreement entered into by the taxpayer and the corporation. The
discounted amount of the excess tax credit accelerated under this
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


subsection as determined by the corporation may be remitted to the
taxpayer as provided in the written agreement between the corporation
and the taxpayer. Subject to subsection (i), (f), the total amount of
qualified investments for which tax credits may be accelerated under
this subsection may not exceed one hundred seventy million dollars
($170,000,000). The requirement for an agreement under section
21(11) of this chapter does not apply to this subsection. This subsection
expires December 31, 2031.
(h) (e) A written agreement under subsection (g) (d) may contain a
provision for payment of liquidated damages:
(1) to the corporation for failure to comply with the conditions set
forth in this chapter and the agreement entered into by the
corporation and taxpayer under this chapter; and
(2) that are in addition to an assessment made by the department
for noncompliance under section 23 of this chapter.
This subsection expires December 31, 2031.
(i) (f) The total aggregated amount of tax credits that the corporation
may discount under subsection (g) (d) and section 16(g) 16(d) of this
chapter in a state fiscal year may not exceed seventeen million dollars
($17,000,000), as determined before the discount is applied. This
subsection expires December 31, 2031.
SECTION 11. IC 6-3.1-26-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.165-2021,
SECTION 89, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) If a pass through entity does not have state
tax liability against which the tax credit may be applied, a shareholder,
member, or partner of the pass through entity is entitled to a tax credit
equal to:
(1) the tax credit determined for the pass through entity for the
taxable year; multiplied by
(2) the percentage of the pass through entity's distributive income
to which the shareholder, member, or partner is entitled.
(b) Subject to subsection (d) and (g), (d), a shareholder, member, or
partner of a pass through entity that is entitled to a tax credit under this
section may carry forward an unused credit for the number of years
determined by the corporation, not to exceed nine (9) consecutive
taxable years, beginning with the taxable year after the taxable year in
which the pass through entity makes the qualified investment.
(c) The amount that a shareholder, member, or partner may carry
forward to a particular taxable year under this section equals the
unused part of a tax credit allowed under this chapter to which the
shareholder, member, or partner is entitled.
(d) This subsection applies only to a pass through entity that:
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(1) proposes at least five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000)
in total investment over a five (5) year period; and
(2) enters into a written agreement with the corporation under this
subsection before January 1, 2017, and the shareholders,
members, or partners of the pass through entity agree to claim tax
credits under this chapter for not more than one hundred seventy
million dollars ($170,000,000) of qualified investment that is
made as part of the investment proposed as described in
subdivision (1).
Notwithstanding subsection (b), the corporation may accelerate to the
current taxable year the excess tax credit amount that could otherwise
be carried forward by all shareholders, members, or partners of a pass
through entity under subsection (b). The excess amount of the tax
credit accelerated under this subsection shall be discounted as
determined under a written agreement entered into by the pass through
entity and the corporation. Subject to subsection (f), the total amount
of qualified investments for which tax credits may be accelerated under
this subsection may not exceed one hundred seventy million dollars
($170,000,000). The discounted amount of the excess tax credit
accelerated under this subsection as determined by the corporation may
be remitted to the shareholders, members, or partners of the pass
through entity as provided in the written agreement between the
corporation and the pass through entity. The requirement for an
agreement under section 21(11) of this chapter does not apply to this
subsection. This subsection expires December 31, 2025.
(e) A written agreement under subsection (d) may contain a
provision for payment of liquidated damages:
(1) to the corporation for failure to comply with the conditions set
forth in this chapter and the agreement entered into by the
corporation and pass through entity under this chapter;
(2) that are personally guaranteed by the shareholders, members,
or partners of the pass through entity; and
(3) that are in addition to an assessment made by the department
for noncompliance under section 23 of this chapter.
This subsection expires December 31, 2025.
(f) The total aggregated amount of tax credits that the corporation
may discount under subsection (d) and section 15(d) of this chapter in
a state fiscal year may not exceed seventeen million dollars
($17,000,000), as determined before the discount is applied. This
subsection expires December 31, 2025.
(g) (d) This subsection applies only to a pass through entity that:
(1) proposes at least two hundred fifty million dollars
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


($250,000,000) in total investment over a five (5) year period; and
(2) enters into a written agreement with the corporation under this
subsection before July 1, 2022, and the shareholders, members,
or partners of the pass through entity agree to claim tax credits
under this chapter for not more than one hundred seventy million
dollars ($170,000,000) of qualified investment that is made as
part of the investment proposed as described in subdivision (1).
Notwithstanding subsection (b), the corporation may accelerate to the
current taxable year the excess tax credit amount that could otherwise
be carried forward by all shareholders, members, or partners of a pass
through entity under subsection (b). The excess amount of the tax
credit accelerated under this subsection shall be discounted as
determined under a written agreement entered into by the pass through
entity and the corporation. Subject to subsection (i), (f), the total
amount of qualified investments for which tax credits may be
accelerated under this subsection may not exceed one hundred seventy
million dollars ($170,000,000). The discounted amount of the excess
tax credit accelerated under this subsection as determined by the
corporation may be remitted to the shareholders, members, or partners
of the pass through entity as provided in the written agreement between
the corporation and the pass through entity. The requirement for an
agreement under section 21(11) of this chapter does not apply to this
subsection. This subsection expires December 31, 2031.
(h) (e) A written agreement under subsection (g) (d) may contain a
provision for payment of liquidated damages:
(1) to the corporation for failure to comply with the conditions set
forth in this chapter and the agreement entered into by the
corporation and pass through entity under this chapter;
(2) that are personally guaranteed by the shareholders, members,
or partners of the pass through entity; and
(3) that are in addition to an assessment made by the department
for noncompliance under section 23 of this chapter.
This subsection expires December 31, 2031.
(i) (f) The total aggregated amount of tax credits that the corporation
may discount under subsection (g) (d) and section 15(g) 15(d) of this
chapter in a state fiscal year may not exceed seventeen million dollars
($17,000,000), as determined before the discount is applied. This
subsection expires December 31, 2031.
SECTION 12. IC 9-17-5-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 91, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) As used in this section, "qualified service
provider" means a person able to provide electronic lien or electronic
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


title services in coordination with vehicle lienholders and state
departments of motor vehicles.
(b) As used in this section, "qualified vendor" refers to a person with
whom the bureau contracts to:
(1) develop;
(2) implement; and
(3) provide ongoing support with respect to;
a statewide electronic lien and title system under this section.
(c) As used in this section, "statewide electronic lien and title
system" or "system" means a statewide electronic lien and title system
implemented by the bureau under this section to process:
(1) vehicle titles;
(2) certificate of title data in which a lien is notated; and
(3) the notification, maintenance, and release of security interests
in vehicles;
through electronic means instead of paper documents.
(d) Not later than the dates set forth in subsection (h), the bureau
shall implement a statewide electronic lien and title system for the
following purposes:
(1) To facilitate and promote commerce and governmental
transactions by validating and authorizing the use of electronic
records.
(2) To modernize the law and eliminate barriers to electronic
commerce and governmental transactions resulting from
uncertainties related to handwritten and other written materials.
(3) To promote uniformity of the law among the states relating to
the use of electronic and similar technological means of effecting
and performing commercial and governmental transactions.
(4) To promote public confidence in the validity, integrity, and
reliability of electronic commerce and governmental transactions.
(5) To promote the development of the legal and business
infrastructure necessary to implement electronic commerce and
governmental transactions.
(e) The bureau may:
(1) contract with one (1) or more qualified vendors to develop and
implement a statewide electronic lien and title system; or
(2) develop and make available to qualified service providers a
well defined set of information services that will enable secure
access to the data and internal application components necessary
to facilitate the creation of a statewide electronic lien and title
system.
(f) If the bureau elects under subsection (e)(1) to contract with one
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(1) or more qualified vendors to develop and implement a statewide
electronic lien and title system, the following apply:
(1) The bureau shall issue a competitive request for proposals to
assess the qualifications of any vendor seeking to develop,
implement, and provide ongoing support for the system. The
bureau may reserve the right to receive input concerning
specifications for the establishment and operation of the system
from parties that do not respond to the bureau's request for
proposals.
(2) A contract entered into between the bureau and a qualified
vendor may not provide for any costs or charges payable by the
bureau to the qualified vendor. The qualified vendor shall
reimburse the bureau for any reasonable and documented costs
incurred by the bureau and directly associated with the
development, implementation, or ongoing support of the system.
(3) Upon implementing a statewide electronic lien and title
system under this section, the qualified vendor may charge
participating lienholders or their agents a fee for each lien
notification transaction provided through the system, in order to
recover the qualified vendor's costs associated with the
development, implementation, and ongoing administration of the
system. A lien notification fee under this subdivision must be
consistent with market pricing and may not exceed three dollars
and fifty cents ($3.50). The qualified vendor may not charge
lienholders or their agents any additional fee for lien releases,
assignments, or transfers. The qualified vendor may not charge a
fee under this subdivision to a state agency or its agents for lien
notification, lien release, lien assignment, or lien transfer. To
recover their costs associated with the lien, participating
lienholders or their agents may charge:
(A) the borrower in a vehicle loan; or
(B) the lessee in a vehicle lease;
an amount equal to any lien notification fee imposed by the
qualified vendor under this subdivision, plus a fee in an amount
not to exceed three dollars ($3) for each electronic transaction in
which a lien is notated.
(4) A qualified vendor may also serve as a qualified service
provider to motor vehicle lienholders if the following conditions
are met:
(A) The contract between the bureau and the qualified vendor
must include provisions specifically prohibiting the qualified
vendor from using information concerning vehicle titles for
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


any commercial, marketing, business, or other purpose not
specifically contemplated by this chapter.
(B) The contract between the bureau and the qualified vendor
must include an acknowledgment by the qualified vendor that
the qualified vendor is required to enter into agreements to
exchange electronic lien data with any:
(i) qualified service providers that offer electronic lien or
title services in Indiana and that have been approved by the
bureau for participation in the system; and
(ii) qualified service providers that are not qualified vendors.
(C) The bureau must periodically monitor the fees charged by
a qualified vendor that also:
(i) serves as a qualified service provider to lienholders; or
(ii) provides services as a qualified vendor to other qualified
service providers;
to ensure that the qualified vendor is not engaging in predatory
pricing.
(g) If the bureau elects under subsection (e)(2) to develop an
interface to provide qualified service providers secure access to data to
facilitate the creation of a statewide electronic lien and title system, the
following apply:
(1) The bureau shall establish:
(A) the total cost to develop the statewide electronic lien and
title system by July 1, 2022;
(B) qualifications for third party service providers offering
electronic lien services; and
(C) a qualification process to:
(i) evaluate electronic lien and title system technologies
developed by third party service providers; and
(ii) determine whether such technologies comply with
defined security and platform standards.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2022, the bureau shall publish on the
bureau's website the qualifications established by the bureau
under subdivision (1). A third party service provider that seeks to
become qualified by the bureau under this subsection must
demonstrate the service provider's qualifications, in the form and
manner specified by the bureau, not later than thirty (30) days
after the date of the bureau's publication under this subdivision.
After the elapse of the thirty (30) day period during which third
party service providers may respond to the bureau's publication
under this subdivision, the bureau shall notify each responding
third party service provider as to:
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(A) the total cost to develop the system, as determined by the
bureau under subdivision (1); and
(B) whether the third party service provider has met the
qualifications established by the bureau under subdivision (1)
and is approved to participate in the statewide electronic lien
and title system.
(3) Not later than thirty (30) days after receiving a notice of
approval from the bureau under subdivision (2), each qualified
service provider shall notify the bureau of the qualified service
provider's intention to participate in the statewide electronic lien
and title system.
(4) Upon implementing a statewide electronic lien and title
system under this section, the bureau may charge participating
service providers or their agents a fee for each lien transaction
provided through the system in order to recover the bureau's costs
associated with the development, implementation, and ongoing
administration of the system. A fee under this subdivision must be
consistent with market pricing and may not exceed three dollars
and twenty-five cents ($3.25). A fee collected under this
subdivision shall be deposited in the commission fund. Fees
collected by the bureau for the implementation of a statewide
electronic lien and title system are limited to those contained in
this subdivision. This subdivision expires July 1, 2025.
(5) (4) A contract entered into between the bureau and a qualified
service provider may not provide for any costs or charges payable
by the bureau to the qualified service provider.
(6) Upon the implementation of a statewide electronic lien and
title system under this section, a qualified service provider may
charge participating lienholders or their agents transaction fees
consistent with market pricing in addition to the fees described in
subdivision (4). A fee under this subdivision may not be charged
to a state agency or its agents for lien notification, lien release,
lien assignment, or lien transfer. To recover their costs associated
with a lien, participating lienholders or their agents may charge:
(A) the borrower in a vehicle loan; or
(B) the lessee in a vehicle lease;
an amount equal to any fee imposed by a qualified service
provider under this subdivision, plus a fee in an amount not to
exceed three dollars ($3) for each electronic transaction in which
a lien is notated. This subdivision expires July 1, 2025.
(7) (5) The contract between the bureau and a qualified service
provider must include provisions specifically prohibiting the
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


qualified service provider from using information concerning
vehicle titles for any commercial, marketing, business, or other
purpose not specifically contemplated by this chapter.
(h) Subject to subsection (i), the bureau shall implement, and allow
or require the use of, a statewide electronic lien and title system under
this section as follows:
(1) A statewide electronic lien system that is capable of
processing:
(A) certificate of title data in which a lien is notated; and
(B) the notification, maintenance, and release of security
interests in vehicles;
through electronic means must be made available for voluntary
use by vehicle lienholders not later than July 1, 2022.
(2) Subject to subsection (j)(5), the bureau shall require that the
statewide electronic lien system made available under subdivision
(1) be used for processing:
(A) certificate of title data in which a lien is notated; and
(B) the notification, maintenance, and release of security
interests in vehicles;
after June 30, 2023.
(3) A statewide electronic title system capable of processing
vehicle titles through electronic means must be made available for
voluntary use by vehicle dealers, lienholders, and owners not later
than July 1, 2025.
(4) The bureau shall require that the statewide electronic title
system made available under subdivision (3) be used for
processing vehicle titles after June 30, 2026.
(i) Subsection (h) does not prohibit the bureau or any:
(1) qualified vendor with whom the bureau contracts under
subsection (f); or
(2) qualified service provider with whom the bureau contracts
under subsection (g);
from implementing, making available, or requiring the use of a
statewide electronic lien system described in subsection (h)(1) at the
same time as, or in conjunction with, a statewide electronic title system
described in subsection (h)(3), or from implementing, making
available, or requiring the use of a statewide electronic lien system
described in subsection (h)(1) or a statewide electronic title system
described in subsection (h)(3) before the applicable dates otherwise set
forth in subsection (h).
(j) The following apply to the use of a statewide electronic lien
system described in subsection (h)(1):
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(1) Notwithstanding section 5(b) of this chapter, if there are one
(1) or more liens or encumbrances on a motor vehicle, the bureau
may electronically transmit the lien to the first lienholder and
notify the first lienholder of any additional liens. Subsequent lien
satisfactions may be electronically transmitted to the bureau and
must include the name and address of the person satisfying the
lien.
(2) Whenever the electronic transmission of lien notifications and
lien satisfactions is used, a certificate of title need not be issued
until the last lien is satisfied and a clear certificate of title can be
issued to the owner of the motor vehicle. The bureau may print or
issue electronically the clear certificate of title to the owner or
subsequent assignee of the motor vehicle.
(3) If a motor vehicle is subject to an electronic lien, the
certificate of title for the motor vehicle is considered to be
physically held by the lienholder for purposes of compliance with
state or federal odometer disclosure requirements.
(4) A certified copy of the bureau's electronic record of a lien is
admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding in
Indiana as evidence of the existence of the lien. If a certificate of
title is maintained electronically in a statewide electronic title
system described in subsection (h)(3), a certified copy of the
bureau's electronic record of the certificate of title is admissible
in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding in Indiana as
evidence of the existence and contents of the certificate of title.
(5) All individuals and lienholders who conduct at least twelve
(12) lien transactions annually must use the statewide electronic
lien and title system implemented under this section to record
information concerning the perfection and release of a security
interest in a vehicle.
(6) An electronic notice or release of a lien made through the
statewide electronic lien and title system implemented under this
section has the same force and effect as a notice or release of a
lien made on a paper document.
(7) The bureau may convert an existing paper lien to an electronic
lien upon request of the primary lienholder. The bureau, or a third
party contracting with the bureau under this section, is authorized
to collect a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for each
conversion performed under this subdivision. A fee under this
subdivision may not be charged to a state agency or its agents.
(8) Notwithstanding section 5 of this chapter, any requirement
that a security interest or other information appear on a certificate
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


of title is satisfied by the inclusion of that information in an
electronic file maintained in an electronic title system.
(k) Nothing in this section precludes the bureau from collecting a
title fee for the preparation and issuance of a title.
(l) The bureau may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this
section.
SECTION 13. IC 14-8-2-48, AS AMENDED BY P.L.251-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 48. (a) "Commission", except as provided in this
section, refers to the natural resources commission.
(b) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-1, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-13-1-1.
(c) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-2, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-13-2-2.
(d) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-4, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-13-4-1.
(e) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-5, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-13-5-1.
(f) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-6, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-13-6-2.
(g) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-9, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-13-9-2.
(h) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-20-11, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-20-11-1.
(i) (h) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-28-4, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-28-4-1.
(j) (i) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-30-2, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-30-2-2.
(k) (j) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-30-3, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-30-3-2.
(l) (k) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-30-4, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-30-4-2.
(m) (l) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-30.5, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-30.5-1-2.
(n) (m) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-33-20, has the
meaning set forth in IC 14-33-20-2.
SECTION 14. IC 14-8-2-107, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2022,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 107. "Fund" has the following meaning:
(1) For purposes of IC 14-9-5, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-9-5-1.
(2) For purposes of IC 14-9-8-21, the meaning set forth in
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


IC 14-9-8-21.
(3) For purposes of IC 14-9-8-21.5, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-9-8-21.5.
(4) For purposes of IC 14-9-9, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-9-9-3.
(5) For purposes of IC 14-12-1, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-12-1-1.
(6) For purposes of IC 14-12-2, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-12-2-2.
(7) For purposes of IC 14-12-3, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-12-3-2.
(8) For purposes of IC 14-13-1, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-13-1-2.
(9) For purposes of IC 14-13-2, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-13-2-3.
(10) For purposes of IC 14-16-1, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-16-1-30.
(11) For purposes of IC 14-19-8, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-19-8-1.
(12) For purposes of IC 14-19-11, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-19-11-3.1.
(13) For purposes of IC 14-20-11, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-20-11-2.
(14) (13) For purposes of IC 14-22-3, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-22-3-1.
(15) (14) For purposes of IC 14-22-4, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-22-4-1.
(16) (15) For purposes of IC 14-22-5, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-22-5-1.
(17) (16) For purposes of IC 14-22-8, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-22-8-1.
(18) (17) For purposes of IC 14-22-34, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-22-34-2.
(19) (18) For purposes of IC 14-23-3, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-23-3-1.
(20) (19) For purposes of IC 14-25-2-4, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-25-2-4.
(21) (20) For purposes of IC 14-25-10, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-25-10-1.
(22) (21) For purposes of IC 14-25.5, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-25.5-1-3.
(23) (22) For purposes of IC 14-31-2, the meaning set forth in
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


IC 14-31-2-5.
(24) (23) For purposes of IC 14-25-12, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-25-12-1.
(25) (24) For purposes of IC 14-32-8, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-32-8-1.
(26) (25) For purposes of IC 14-33-14, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-33-14-3.
(27) (26) For purposes of IC 14-33-21, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-33-21-1.
(28) (27) For purposes of IC 14-34-6-15, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-34-6-15.
(29) (28) For purposes of IC 14-34-14, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-34-14-1.
(30) (29) For purposes of IC 14-34-19-1.3, the meaning set forth
in IC 14-34-19-1.3(a).
(31) (30) For purposes of IC 14-34-19-1.5, the meaning set forth
in IC 14-34-19-1.5(a).
(32) (31) For purposes of IC 14-37-10, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-37-10-1.
SECTION 15. IC 14-20-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Wendell L. Willkie Memorial Commission).
SECTION 16. IC 20-29-6-4.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.1. (a) This section applies to
collective bargaining between a school employer and the exclusive
representative of the school bus drivers employed by the school
employer.
(b) Collective bargaining described in subsection (a) is limited
to the subjects expressly listed in section 4 of this chapter.
(c) The prohibited subjects of collective bargaining listed in
section 4.5 of this chapter apply to collective bargaining described
in subsection (a).
SECTION 17. IC 20-32-8.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 291, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), the plan required by this chapter must include the
following:
(1) Reading skill standards for grade 1 through grade 3.
(2) A method for making determinant evaluations by grade 3 that
remedial action is required for a student, including:
(A) except as provided in subsections (c) and (g), beginning
with evaluations administered during the 2024-2025 school
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


year, retention of the student in grade 3 if the student has not
achieved a passing score on the determinant evaluation of
reading skills approved by the state board after the student has
had an opportunity to retake the determinant evaluation at least
twice in the summer; and
(B) the use of curricular materials and supplemental materials
aligned to the science of reading that are designed to address
deficiencies in reading;
after other methods of remediation have been evaluated or used,
or both, if reading skills are below the standard. Appropriate
consultation with parents or guardians must be part of the plan.
(3) A requirement that schools notify a student's parent of the
following:
(A) The student's assessment results regarding skill level in:
(i) phonemic awareness;
(ii) phonics;
(iii) fluency;
(iv) vocabulary; and
(v) comprehension.
(B) The student's assessment results on the determinant
evaluation of reading skills approved by the state board.
(C) Any intervention provided to the student or any remedial
action taken.
(4) A requirement that schools monitor the progress of students
who failed to achieve a valid passing score on the:
(A) determinant evaluation of reading skills approved by the
state board; or
(B) statewide assessment program test.
(5) A requirement that schools provide reading instruction that
includes a core reading program aligned with the science of
reading to all students in kindergarten through grade 8.
(6) A requirement for the administration of the determinant
evaluation of reading skills approved by the state board to
students in grade 2.
(7) A requirement that all students take the determinant
evaluation of reading skills approved by the state board until the
student:
(A) receives a passing score, regardless of the student's grade
level; or
(B) enters grade 7.
(8) A requirement that a school report the following to the
department:
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


(A) The literacy interventions that will be used for students in
grade 2 who are at risk of not being reading proficient and
students in grade 3 who do not achieve a valid passing score
on the determinant evaluation of reading skills approved by
the state board.
(B) The literacy interventions in use before the adoption of the
plan for students in grade 2 who are at risk of not being
reading proficient and students in grade 3 who do not achieve
a valid passing score on the determinant evaluation of reading
skills approved by the state board.
(C) The literacy interventions in use before the adoption of the
plan for students who do not achieve a valid passing score on
the determinant evaluation of reading skills approved by the
state board.
(D) The number of students being served by the interventions
described in clauses (B) and (C).
(E) The cost of providing the interventions described in
clauses (B) and (C).
(F) Any other information requested by the department.
(9) Requirements for a school in which fewer than seventy
percent (70%) of students of the school achieved a valid passing
score on the determinant evaluation of reading skills approved by
the state board that must include the following:
(A) Use of curriculum that is:
(i) based on the science of reading;
(ii) age appropriate; and
(iii) approved by the department.
(B) Employment of the following:
(i) Before July 1, 2025, an instructional coach who is trained
in the science of reading, as determined by the department.
This item expires January 1, 2026.
(ii) After June 30, 2025, an instructional coach with a
literacy related endorsement who is trained in the science of
reading.
(C) Use of only benchmark, formative, interim, or similar
assessments that:
(i) show alignment with Indiana's academic standards; and
(ii) are approved by the department.
(D) Use of a screener procured under IC 20-32-5.1-17(j).
(10) The fiscal impact of each component of the plan, if any. In
determining whether a component has a fiscal impact,
consideration shall be given to whether the component will
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


increase costs to the state or a school corporation or require the
state or school corporation to reallocate resources.
(b) A school may receive a waiver of the requirements provided in
511 IAC 6.2-3.1-4(a)(2) if the state board approves an alternative
reading plan provided by the school.
(c) Except as approved by the department under subsection (g), a
student who would otherwise be subject to retention in grade 3 under
the plan is not subject to the retention requirement only if the student
meets one (1) of the following criteria:
(1) The student was subject to retention and has been retained in
grade 3 for one (1) school year.
(2) The student has an intellectual disability or the student's
individualized education program specifies that retention is not
appropriate, and the student's case conference committee has
determined that promotion to another grade is appropriate.
(3) The student is an English learner who has received services
for fewer than two (2) years and a committee consisting of:
(A) the student's parent;
(B) a building level administrator or designee;
(C) a classroom teacher of service;
(D) an English learner teacher of record, if one exists; and
(E) an English learner district administrator, if one exists;
determines that promotion is appropriate based on the
implementation of research based instructional practices outlined
in the student's individual learning plan.
(4) The student received a score of proficient or above proficient
in grade 3 math on the statewide summative assessment.
(5) The student:
(A) has received intensive intervention as determined by the
department in reading for two (2) or more years; and
(B) was retained more than one (1) time throughout
kindergarten, grade 1, or grade 2.
(d) A student who is not subject to the retention requirement as
provided under subsection (c) must be provided with additional reading
instruction that is aligned with the science of reading until the student
achieves a passing score on the determinant evaluation of reading skills
approved by the state board.
(e) Before October 1 of each school year, the department shall:
(1) identify each incoming student (as defined in section 0.7 of
this chapter) enrolled in kindergarten in a school in Indiana; and
(2) notify the parent or guardian of the student of the retention
requirement under this chapter for grade 3 students who do not
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


achieve a passing score on the Indiana reading evaluation and
determination (IRead3).
(f) The department shall establish a standard reporting process and
reporting window for schools to report students who qualify for an
exemption under subsection (c).
(g) The department shall establish a registration process for schools
to exempt an English language learner who:
(1) does not achieve a passing score on the determinant
evaluation of reading skills approved by the state board; and
(2) attends a school that has a student population comprised of at
least fifty percent (50%) of English language learners in grade 3,
as determined by the department;
from compliance with the requirements under subsection (a)(2)(A)
until the beginning of the 2027-2028 school year. This subsection
expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 18. IC 33-33-40-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.224-2025,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 1. (a) Jennings County
constitutes the eighty-sixth judicial circuit.
(b) The Jennings circuit court has a standard small claims and
misdemeanor division.
(c) The judge of the Jennings circuit court and the judge of the
Jennings superior court may jointly appoint one (1) full-time magistrate
under IC 33-23-5 to serve the circuit and superior courts. This
subsection expires December 31, 2025.
(d) A magistrate continues in office until jointly removed by the
judge of the Jennings circuit court and the judge of the Jennings
superior court. This subsection expires December 31, 2025.
(e) (c) Beginning January 1, 2026, the judges of the Jennings circuit
and superior court may not appoint a magistrate under IC 33-23-5.
(f) (d) A magistrate appointed under this section is terminated by
operation of law on December 31, 2025.
SECTION 19. IC 36-7-30.2-18, AS ADDED BY P.L.43-2023,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) The unit shall notify a commander that the
commander may recommend a civilian or military representative of the
installation in mission sustainment activities to serve as a nonvoting
adviser to the plan commission.
(b) The notice must inform the commander that a nonvoting adviser:
(1) is not a member of the plan commission, but is entitled to
attend and participate in all plan commission meetings;
(2) is not entitled to a salary, per diem, or reimbursement of
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


expenses; and
(3) serves at the pleasure of the legislative body of the unit.
(c) The unit shall appoint an individual to the position of nonvoting
adviser upon the request of the commander at any time. An individual
may only be appointed as a nonvoting adviser upon recommendation
of the commander.
(d) This subsection applies to a unit that has a plan commission on
June 30, 2023. The legislative body of the unit shall send the notice not
later than January 1, 2024. This subsection expires July 1, 2025.
(e) (d) This subsection applies to a unit that establishes a plan
commission after June 30, 2023. The legislative body of the unit shall
send the notice not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the
date that the plan commission is established.
SECTION 20. IC 36-7-30.2-19, AS ADDED BY P.L.43-2023,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) The legislative body of the unit must adopt
a resolution that:
(1) acknowledges the requirements of this chapter; and
(2) designates an employee of the unit to serve as staff liaison
between the unit and the installation for purposes of coordinating
the unit's land use activities within the state area of interest.
(b) The unit shall contact the commander to:
(1) discuss coordination between the unit and the installation in
compliance with this chapter; and
(2) notify the commander of the staff liaison designated in the
resolution.
(c) This subsection applies to a unit that has a plan commission on
June 30, 2023. The legislative body of the unit shall comply with
subsections (a) and (b) not later than January 1, 2024. This subsection
expires July 1, 2025.
(d) (c) This subsection applies to a unit that establishes a plan
commission after June 30, 2023. The legislative body of the unit shall
comply with subsections (a) and (b) not later than one hundred eighty
(180) days after the date that the plan commission is established.
SECTION 21. IC 36-7-30.2-20, AS ADDED BY P.L.43-2023,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) Except as provided in section 21 of this
chapter, a unit shall adopt or amend the unit's comprehensive plan,
zoning and subdivision ordinances, procedures, and regulations as
needed to implement this chapter and IC 36-7-30.3.
(b) Except as provided in section 21 of this chapter, this subsection
applies to a unit that has a plan commission on June 30, 2023. The unit
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92


shall amend or repeal and adopt the comprehensive plan, zoning and
subdivision ordinances, procedures, and regulations as needed as
provided in subsection (a) not later than January 1, 2025. This
subsection expires July 1, 2025.
(c) (b) This subsection applies to a unit that establishes a plan
commission after June 30, 2023. The unit shall adopt a comprehensive
plan, zoning and subdivision ordinances, procedures, and regulations
as provided in subsection (a) not later than eighteen (18) months after
the plan commission is established.
SECTION 22. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1289—LS 6754/DI 92